Tennessee, session 114, HB1985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-32-304, is amended by deleting
subsection (j) and substituting:
(j) A person shall not sell and install, service, monitor, or respond to alarm
signals, signal devices, fire alarms, or burglar alarms used to detect fire, burglary,
breaking or entering, intrusion, shoplifting, pilferage, or theft in violation of this part or the
rules adopted under this part.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1985
011421
- 1 -